Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6307.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:

SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Special plate for the Real Access Motivates Progress.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Real Access Motivates
Progress. The plates shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit entity Real Access Motivates
Progress.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Real Access Motivates Progress motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as
regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by Real Access Motivates Progress in
conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state
police.
(d) The Real Access Motivates Progress plates shall be subject to compliance with § 31-3-

117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger,
commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Real Access Motivates Progress plates shall not
be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by Real
Access Motivates Progress and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for
production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paper work submitted to the
division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Real Access
Motivates Progress plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to Real Access Motivates Progress to support accessibility programs
and initiatives.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to Real Access Motivates Progress.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Real Access Motivates
Progress plates, Real Access Motivates Progress must use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and
for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.
(j) Real Access Motivates Progress will be required to submit an annual accounting report
before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Real Access Motivates Progress
plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC002848
========
LC002848 - Page 2 of 3